Utah statutes.
58-1-104.   Director of division -- Appointment -- Duties.
(1)  The division shall be under the supervision, direction, and control of a
director.  The director shall be appointed by the executive director with the
approval of the governor.  The director shall hold office at the pleasure of
the governor.
(2)  The director shall perform all duties, functions, and responsibilities
assigned to the division by law or rule and, where provided, with the
collaboration and assistance of the boards established under this title.
